Utah statutes.
54-8-21.   Assessments -- Prepayment of unpaid installments.
The governing body may in the resolution levying the assessments provide that
all unpaid installments of assessments levied against any piece of property
may (but only in their entirety) be paid prior to the dates on which they
become due if the property owner paying such installments pays all interest
which would accrue thereon to the next succeeding date on which interest is
payable on the bonds issued in anticipation of the collection of the
assessments, together with such additional amount of interest as in the
opinion of the governing body is necessary to assure the availability of money
fully sufficient to pay interest on the bonds as interest becomes due and any
redemption premiums which may become payable on the bonds in order to retire
in advance of maturity bonds in a sufficient amount to utilize the assessments
thus paid in advance. If no bonds have been issued then all unpaid
installments of assessments levied against any piece of property may be paid
in their entirety prior to the date upon which they become due by paying the
principal amount due and the interest accrued thereon to the date of payment.
